Utah statutes.
77-15-7.   Statute of limitations and speedy trial -- Effect of incompetency
of defendant.
(1)  The statute of limitations is tolled during any period in which the
defendant is adjudicated incompetent to proceed.
(2)  Any period of time during which the defendant has been adjudicated
incompetent and any period during which he is being evaluated for competency
may not be computed in determining the defendant's speedy trial rights.
